en: Breaded cod fish
fr: Poissons panés de cabillaud, Poisson pané de cabillaud
hr: Pohani bakalar
it: Merluzzo comune impanato
nl: Gepaneerde kabeljauw

en: Breaded Alaska pollock
fr: Poissons panés de colin d'Alaska, Poissons panés de colin, Poisson pané de colin
hr: Pohani aljaski pollock
it: Merluzzo d'Alaska impanato
nl: Gepaneerde Alaskakoolvis

en: Breaded hake fish
fr: Poissons panés de merlu blanc, Poissons panés de merlu, Poisson pané de merlu
hr: Pohana riba oslić
it: Nasello impanato
nl: Gepaneerde heek

en: Frozen breaded hake fillet
fr: Filet de merlu pâné surgelé

en: Breaded whiting
fr: Poissons panés de merlan, Poisson pané de merlan, Merlans panés, Merlan pané
hr: Pohani bjelanjak
it: Merlano impanato
nl: Gepaneerde wijting

en: Whiting
fr: Merlan

en: Fried whiting
fr: Merlans frits, Merlan frit

en: Steamed whiting
fr: Merlan cuit à la vapeur

en: Canned fishes, canned fish
bg: Рибени консерви
ca: Peix enllaunat
de: Fischkonserve
es: Conservas de pescado
fi: purkitetut kalat
fr: Poissons en conserve, conserves de poisson, conserves de poissons, conserve de poisson, conserve de poissons, poisson en conserve
hr: Riblje konzerve
hu: Halak konzervben
it: Pesce in scatola
ja: 魚の缶詰
nl: Vis in blik/pot
pl: Konserwy rybne, Konserwa rybna
pt: Peixe enlatado
ro: Conserve de pește, Conservă de pește
ru: Рыбные консервы
th: ปลากระป๋อง
tr: Konserve balık
zh: 罐头鱼

en: Grilled European pilchard, Grilled sardine
fr: Sardine grillée

en: Smoked sardines
fr: Sardines fumées

en: Canned sardines
bg: Консервирани сардини
ca: Sardines en conserva
da: Dåsesardiner
de: Sardinen in Dosen
es: Sardinas en conserva
fi: purkitetut sardiinit
fr: Sardines en conserve
he: סרדינים בשימורים
hr: Sardine u konzervi
hu: Szardíniakonzervek
it: Sardine in scatola
nl: Sardientjes in blik/pot
pl: Sardynki w puszce
pt: Sardinhas enlatadas
ro: Conserve de sardine
ru: Консервированные сардины
tr: Konserve sardalya

en: Sardines in oil
bg: Сардини в олио
ca: Sardines amb oli
de: Ölsardinen
es: Sardinas en aceite
fi: sardiinit öljyssä
fr: Sardines à l'huile
he: סרדינים בשמן
hr: Sardine u ulju
hu: Szardínia olaj
it: Sardine sottolio
nl: Sardientjes op olie
pl: Sardynki w oleju
pt: Sardinhas em olio
ro: Sardine în ulei

en: Sardines in olive oil, sardines in extra virgin olive oil
bg: Сардини в маслиново масло
de: Sardinen in Olivenöl
es: Sardinas en aceite de oliva
fi: sardiineja oliiviöljyssä
fr: Sardines à l'huile d'olive, sardines à l'huile d'olive vierge, sardines à l'huile d'olive vierge extra, sardines à l'huile d'olive
hr: Sardine u maslinovom ulju
it: Sardine in olio d'oliva
nl: Sardientjes op olijfolie
pt: Sardinhas em azeite de oliveira
ro: Sardine în ulei de măsline

en: Sardines in sunflower oil
bg: Сардини в слънчогледово олио
de: Sardinen in Sonnenblumenöl
es: Sardinas en aceite de girasol
fi: sardiineja auringonkukkaöljyssä
fr: Sardines à l'huile de tournesol
hr: Sardine u suncokretovom ulju
it: Sardine in olio di semi di girasole
nl: Sardientjes op zonnebloemolie
pt: Sardinhasm em óleo de girassol
ro: Sardine în ulei de floarea soarelui

en: Sardines in oil and lemon, sardines with lemon
bg: Сардини в олио и лимон
fi: sardiinit öljyssä sitruunalla
fr: Sardines à l’huile et au citron, Sardines au citron
hr: Sardine u ulju i limun
it: Sardine in olio e limone, Sardine sottolio al limone
nl: Sardientjes op olie en citroen
ro: Sardine în ulei și lămâie

en: Sardines in oil and chili
fr: Sardines à l’huile et au piment, Sardines au piment, Sardines à l’huile au piment
hr: Sardine u ulju i čili
it: Sardine sott'olio e peperoncino
nl: Sardientjes op olie en piment

en: Sardines in tomato sauce, Canned European pilchard in tomato sauce, Canned sardine in tomato sauce
bg: Сардини в доматен сос
de: Sardinen in Tomatensauce
es: Sardinas en salsa de tomate
fi: sardiineja tomaattikastikkeessa
fr: Sardines à la tomate, Sardine sauce tomate appertisée
hr: Sardine u umaku od rajčice
it: Sardine in salsa di pomodoro
nl: Sardientjes op tomatensaus
pt: Sardinhas em molho de tomate
ro: Sardine în sos de roșii, Sardine în sos tomat

en: Canned pilchard in tomato sauce
fr: Pilchard sauce tomate en conserve, Pilchard sauce tomate appertisé

en: Sardines without oil
de: Sardinen ohne Öl
fr: Sardines sans huile, Filets de sardines sans huile
hr: Sardine bez ulja
nl: Sardientjes zonder olie
ro: Sardine fără ulei